Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4623.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6. (Partnership defined). (1) A Subject to subsection (2), a partnership is an association of 2 or more persons, which may consist of husband and wife, to spouses, that carry on as co-owners of a business for profit. ; any Any partnership heretofore established consisting of husband and wife only spouses, formed since January 10, 1942 shall constitute constitutes a valid partnership. (2) But any Any association formed under any other statute of this state, or any statute adopted by an authority, other than the authority of this state, is not a partnership under this act, unless such that association would have been a partnership in this state prior to before the adoption of this act. ; but this This act shall apply applies to limited partnerships except in so far as the statutes relating to such limited partnerships are inconsistent herewith.with this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.